Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; GRANTS FOR SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION, EDUCATION, AND RECOVERY PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin $3,600,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,600,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for grants to local health departments and Tribal health departments for purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 144.197, subdivision 4. new text end